Maine, session 132, LD399.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §943-C, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 640, §3, is amended
to read:
10. Transfer Retention of proceeds. If, after provision of notice under subsection 9,
a former owner fails to claim the excess sale proceeds within 30 days of the final published
notice, the municipality shall transfer retain the excess sale proceeds to the Unclaimed
Property Fund under Title 33, section 2141.